Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4403
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature:

(1) To provide for (a) legislative oversight of the child welfare system through an improved electronic data collection system, (b) improved child welfare outcome measurements through increased reporting by the department, and (c) an independent evaluation of the child welfare system; and

(2) To develop an electronic data collection system to integrate child welfare information into one system to more effectively manage, track, and share information, especially in child welfare case management.

Laws 2012, LB1160, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 13.